Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1495YH (1) 91 as/js H.F. 51 Section 1. Section 721.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Violates the provisions of section 3 728.7A. 4 Sec. 2. Section 728.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. âObscene performanceâ means a visual 7 performance by a person, whether compensated or uncompensated, 8 that exposes the personâs genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or 9 female breast, including prosthetics and artificial sexual 10 organs or substitutes therefor, or involves the person 11 engaging in a sex act, masturbation, excretory function, or 12 sadomasochistic abuse, which the average person, viewing the 13 performance as a whole and applying contemporary community 14 standards with respect to what is suitable to be viewed by 15 minors, would find appeals to the prurient interest and is 16 patently offensive, and the performance taken as a whole lacks 17 serious artistic, literary, political, or scientific value. 18 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 728.1A Enforcement. 19 The office of attorney general, as authorized by section 20 13.2, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , or the county attorney of 21 the county in which a violation of this chapter occurs shall 22 enforce the provisions of this chapter. 23 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 728.2A Exposing minor to obscene 24 performance. 25 Any person who knowingly exposes a minor to an obscene 26 performance is guilty of a public offense and shall upon 27 conviction be guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. 28 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 728.3A Admitting minors to premises 29 with obscene performances. 30 1. A person who knowingly sells, gives, delivers, or 31 provides a minor who is not a child a pass or admits the minor 32 to premises where an obscene performance is performed is guilty 33 of a public offense and upon conviction is guilty of a serious 34 misdemeanor. 35 -1- LSB 1495YH (1) 91 as/js 1/ 6 H.F. 51 2. A person who knowingly sells, gives, delivers, or 1 provides a child a pass or admits the minor to premises 2 where an obscene performance is performed is guilty of a 3 public offense and upon conviction is guilty of an aggravated 4 misdemeanor. 5 Sec. 6. Section 728.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 728.6 Civil suit to determine obscenity. 8 1. Whenever the county attorney of any county has reasonable 9 cause to believe that any person is engaged or plans to engage 10 in the dissemination or exhibition of obscene material to 11 minors within the county attorneyâs county , to minors the 12 county attorney may institute a civil proceeding in the 13 district court of the county to enjoin the dissemination or 14 exhibition of obscene material to minors. Such application 15 for injunction is optional and not mandatory and shall not 16 be construed as a prerequisite to criminal prosecution for a 17 violation of this chapter . 18 2. a. The parent or guardian of a minor, or a minor upon 19 attaining eighteen years of age, to whom obscene material 20 has been knowingly disseminated or exhibited, in violation 21 of section 728.2 or 728.3, or who was exposed to an obscene 22 performance, in violation of section 728.2A or 728.3A, may 23 bring a civil action against any person that has knowingly 24 disseminated or exhibited obscene material to the minor or who 25 engaged in or caused or allowed a person to knowingly engage in 26 an obscene performance in the presence of the minor for any of 27 the following remedies: 28 (1) A declaratory judgment. 29 (2) Injunctive relief. 30 (3) Actual, incidental, and consequential damages. 31 (4) Punitive damages, if appropriate. 32 (5) Other equitable relief that the court deems 33 appropriate. 34 b. The minimum award of damages in an action brought 35 -2- LSB 1495YH (1) 91 as/js 2/ 6 H.F. 51 pursuant to this subsection shall be ten thousand dollars. 1 c. An action brought under this subsection may be commenced 2 by a parent or guardian within two years of a violation. An 3 action for a violation brought by a person who was a minor at 4 the time of a violation shall be found within ten years after 5 the person upon whom the offense is committed attains eighteen 6 years of age. 7 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 728.7A Public institutions and funds 8 ââ obscene material ââ obscene performance. 9 1. No public institution, public facility, public 10 equipment, or other physical asset that is owned, leased, or 11 controlled by this state or a political subdivision of this 12 state shall be used for a show, exhibition, or performance that 13 includes obscene material or obscene performances. 14 2. No public institution or facility shall lease, sell, or 15 permit the subleasing of its facilities or property for the 16 purpose of shows, exhibitions, or performances that include 17 obscene material or obscene performances. 18 3. No public funds made available by the state or a 19 political subdivision of this state that are distributed by an 20 institution, board, commission, department, agency, official, 21 or an employee of the state or political subdivision shall be 22 used for the purpose of shows, exhibitions, or performances 23 that include obscene material or obscene performances. 24 4. This section shall not apply to obscene materials that 25 are sent or received as part of a law enforcement investigation 26 or are authorized by law to be sent or received. 27 Sec. 8. REPEAL. Section 728.7, Code 2025, is repealed. 28